Ohio, session 136, SB334.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 5534.454 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 5534.454. In addition to any other name prescribed in the Revised Code or otherwise, the eastbound and westbound lanes of interstate route number four hundred eighty between the point that route crosses under Lancaster drive and interstate route number seventy-seven, in Cuyahoga county, shall be known as the "Officer Jacob J. Derbin Memorial Highway." The director of transportation may erect suitable markers along the highway indicating its name.